Connecticut, session 2026, HB05080.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to (1) remove the charges
collectively called the "Combined Public Benefits Charge" from electric
bills for end use customers of each electric distribution company, and
(2) require that the cost of such charges be paid from the General Fund.